Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1709
Design-build contract, defined.

Design-build contract means a contract between the commission and a design-builder which is subject to a best value-based selection process to furnish (1) architectural, engineering, and related design services and (2) labor, materials, supplies, equipment, and construction services.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 10.